Massachusetts, session 194th, S2217.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, the parcel of land of the
commonwealth specifically described herein, situated in the city of Boston, having been acquired
by the commonwealth and currently under the care and control of the Department of
Conservation and Recreation, is hereby transferred to the The Gardens Cemetery, at the cost of
fair market value, for expansion of the cemetery for burial purposes. Said parcel located off
Baker Street in the West Roxbury section of said city is shown Parcel D on a plan to be recorded
with the Suffolk county registry of deeds entitled "Plan of Land of the Association of the
Evangelical Lutheran Church for Works of Mercy”; By W.O. Badger, Surveyor, 1900; Scale: 1
inch = 20 Feet”; Recorded at the Suffolk County Registry of Deeds in Bk 2743 Pg 307
Beginning at a point on the westerly boundary; thence
N 82<= 56' 24" W a distance of one thousand two hundred feet (1200') to a point; thence
of 6

N 51<= 40' 37" W a distance of eight hundred sixty-one and six tenths (861.60') to a
point; thence
N 38<= 19' 23" E a distance of one thousand seven hundred eighty three and thirteen
hundredths feet (1783.13') to a point; thence
S 51<= 40' 37" E a distance of one hundred sixty five feet (165') to a point; thence
S 55<= 28' 42" E a distance of two hundred thirty nine and twenty four hundredths feet
(239.24') to a point; thence
S 50<= 25' 05" E a distance of twenty and sixty seven hundredths feet (20.67') to a point;
thence
S 50<= 18' 15" E a distance of three hundred seventy eight and four tenths feet (378.4') to
a point; thence
N 37<= 04' 41" E a distance of six hundred ninety and ninety nine hundredths feet
(690.99') to a point; thence
N 39<= 18' 21" E a distance of one thousand one hundred eighty two and fifty nine
hundredths feet (1182.59) to a point; thence
N 40<= 04' 39" E a distance of five hundred thirty three and fifty five hundredths feet
(533.55') to a point; thence
S 54<= 29' 25" E a distance of four hundred forty seven and ninety two hundredths feet
(447.92') to a point; thence
of 6

S 48<= 24' 16" W a distance of one hundred eighty seven and forty six hundredths feet
(187.46') to a point; thence
S 39<= 30' 42" W a distance of eighty nine and sixty one hundredths feet (89.61') to a
point; thence
N 50<= 29' 20" W a distance of fifty feet (50') to a point; thence
S 39 <= 30' 42" W a distance of sixty feet (60') to a point; thence
S 50<= 29' 20" W a distance of fifty feet (50') to a point; thence
S 39<= 30' 42" W a distance of fifty feet (50') to a point; thence
S 17<= 56' 15" W a distance of five hundred nine and seventy eight hundredths feet
(509.78') to a point; thence
S 26<= 51' 55" W a distance of one hundred fifty four and eight hundredths feet (154.08')
to a point; thence
N 63<= 55' 38" W a distance of one hundred eighty one and twenty eight hundredths feet
(181.28') to a point; thence
S 83<= 32' 57" W a distance of eighty and sixty seven hundredths feet (80.67') to a point;
thence
S 48<= 45' 35" W a distance of two hundred eighty two and eleven hundredths feet
(282.11') to a point; thence
of 6

N 81<= 44' 40" W a distance of thirty five and seven hundredths feet (35.07') to a point;
thence
S 67<= 12' 43" W a distance of fifty six and four tenths feet (56.4') to a point; thence
S 33<= 22' 46" W a distance of three hundred twenty one and twenty six hundredths feet
(321.26') to a point; thence
S 46 <= 32' 17" W a distance of eighty eight and fifty two hundredths feet (88.52) to a
point; thence
S 02<= 26' 12" E a distance of ninety four and eight hundredths feet (94.08') to a point;
thence
S 47<= 25' 11" E a distance of fifty and twenty five hundredths feet (50.25') to a point;
thence
S 21<= 48' 05" E a distance of forty three and eight hundredths feet (509.78') to a point;
thence
S 06<= 45' 32" W a distance of one hundred thirty six feet (136') to a point; thence
S 26<= 52' 12" E a distance of eighty four and eight hundredths feet (84.08') to a point;
thence
S 65<= 38' 42" E a distance of two hundred sixty six and seventy four hundredths feet
(266.74') to a point; thence
S 89 <= 27' 53" E a distance of one hundred nine and ninety nine hundredths feet
(109.99) to a point; thence
of 6

S 36<= 16' 26" E a distance of one hundred thirty five and twenty four hundredths feet
(135.24') to a point; thence
The above described parcel of land contains an area of 1,372,670+ square feet or 31.512
acres as shown on said plan. For title reference, see "Plan of Land of the Association of the
Evangelical Lutheran Church for Works of Mercy”; By W.O. Badger, Surveyor, 1900; Scale: 1
inch = 20 Feet”; Recorded at the Suffolk County Registry of Deeds in Bk 2743 Pg 307
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law, the parcel of land of the
commonwealth specifically described herein, situated in the city of Boston, having been acquired
by the commonwealth and currently under the care and control of the Department of
Conservation and Recreation, is hereby transferred to the The Gardens Cemetery, for the cost of
fair market value, for expansion of the cemetery for burial purposes. Said parcel located off
Baker Street in the West Roxbury section of said city is shown Parcel E on a plan to be recorded
with the Suffolk county registry of deeds entitled "Plan of Land of the Association of the
Evangelical Lutheran Church for Works of Mercy”; By W.O. Badger, Surveyor, 1900; Scale: 1
inch = 20 Feet”; Recorded at the Suffolk County Registry of Deeds in Bk 2743 Pg 307
Beginning at a point on the easterly boundary of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts;
thence
N 25<= 52' 06" E a distance of one hundred forty plus or minus feet (140+) to a point;
thence
N 41<= 45' 40" E a distance of one hundred forty seven and four hundredths feet
(147.04) to a point; thence
of 6

N 16<= 46' 51" E a distance of three hundred eighty four and seven tenths feet (384.70')
to a point; thence
S 57<= 34' 36" E a distance of three hundred forty seven and six tenths feet (347.60') to a
point; thence
S 32<= 25' 24" W a distance of seven hundred seventy one and sixty five hundredths feet
(771.65') to a point; thence
N 52<= 12' 37" W a distance of one hundred thirteen and nine tenths feet (113.90') to a
point; thence
N 14<= 00' 26" E a distance of eighty and thirty six hundredths feet (80.36') to a point;
thence
100 The above described parcel of land contains an area of 204,583+ square feet or 4.697
101 acres as shown on said plan. For title reference, see "Plan of Land of the Association of the
102 Evangelical Lutheran Church for Works of Mercy”; By W.O. Badger, Surveyor, 1900; Scale: 1
103 inch = 20 Feet”; Recorded at the Suffolk County Registry of Deeds in Bk 2743 Pg 307
of 6